Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2401
Restricted parking lots; cities of
the metropolitan or primary class; vehicles
towed away; when.

In cities of the metropolitan or primary
class which have not adopted an ordinance conforming to section 60-2401.01, vehicles parked in a
restricted parking lot without the consent of the owner or tenant shall be
subject to being towed away, if the lot is properly posted.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 47, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 1.

Motor vehicles parked in a restricted parking lot without the consent of the owner or tenant shall be subject to being towed away if the lot is properly posted. Packett v. Lincolnland Towing, 227 Neb. 595, 419 N.W.2d 149 (1988).